Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-522
Community Technology Fund; created; use; investment.

The Community Technology Fund is created. The fund shall be granted to public entities or for the public entity's share of public-private partnerships by the commission. The fund shall be used to provide incentives for collaborative community and regional approaches toward more effective and efficient use of technology to meet the needs of citizens, political subdivisions, and other entities as determined by the commission. The fund shall be administered by the office of Chief Information Officer. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1512;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 292;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 17;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 63.
July 1, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.